Maryland, session 2025, SB0040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–10A–04.
(a) Unless otherwise set by local law, a person who undertakes the towing or
removal of a vehicle from a parking lot:
(1) May not charge the owner of the vehicle, the owner’s agent, the insurer
of record, or any secured party more than:
(i) Twice the amount of the total fees normally charged or
authorized by the political subdivision for the public safety impound towing of vehicles;
(ii) Notwithstanding § 16–207(f)(1) of the Commercial Law Article,
the fee normally charged or authorized by the political subdivision from which the vehicle
was towed for the daily storage of impounded vehicles;
(iii) If a political subdivision does not establish a fee limit for the
public safety towing, recovery, or storage of impounded vehicles, $250 for towing and
recovering a vehicle and $30 per day for vehicle storage; and
– 1 –

Ch. 521 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the actual cost of
providing notice under this section;
(2) Shall notify the police department in the jurisdiction where the parking
lot is located within 1 hour after towing or removing the vehicle from the parking lot, and
shall provide the following information:
(i) A description of the vehicle including the vehicle’s registration
plate number and vehicle identification number;
(ii) The date and time the vehicle was towed or removed;
(iii) The reason the vehicle was towed or removed; and
(iv) The locations from which and to which the vehicle was towed or
removed;
(3) (i) [Shall] SUBJECT TO ITEMS (II) AND (III) OF THIS ITEM,
SHALL notify the owner and[, except as provided in item (ii) of this item,] the insurer of
record and any secured party by certified mail, return receipt requested, and first–class
mail within 7 days, exclusive of days that the towing business is closed, after towing or
removing the vehicle, and shall provide the same information required in a notice to a police
department under item (2) of this subsection; [and]
(II) MAY PROVIDE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
ITEM TO THE OWNER ELECTRONICALLY THROUGH THE ADMINISTRATION IF:
1. THE ADMINISTRATION SENDS THE NOTICE TO THE
OWNER USING THE E–MAIL ADDRESS THE OWNER PROVIDED TO THE
ADMINISTRATION, AS SHOWN IN THE ADMINISTRATION’S RECORDS; AND
2. THE TOWER SENDS A NOTICE BY CERTIFIED MAIL,
RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, AND FIRST–CLASS MAIL, TO THE OWNER IF THE
OWNER DOES NOT RESPOND WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER THE ELECTRONIC NOTICE WAS
SENT BY THE ADMINISTRATION; AND
[(ii)] (III) May provide notice required under item (i) of this item to
any secured party or insurer of record electronically, if that form of notice is agreed to by
the tower and the secured party or insurer of record in writing or by electronic
communication;
(4) Shall provide to the owner, any secured party, and the insurer of record
the itemized actual costs of providing notice under this section;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 521
(5) Before towing or removing the vehicle, shall have authorization of the
parking lot owner which shall include:
(i) The name of the person authorizing the tow or removal;
(ii) A statement that the vehicle is being towed or removed at the
request of the parking lot owner; and
(iii) Photographic evidence of the violation or event that precipitated
the towing of the vehicle;
(6) Shall obtain commercial liability insurance in the amount required by
federal law for transporting property in interstate or foreign commerce to cover the cost of
any damage to the vehicle resulting from the person’s negligence;
(7) May not employ or otherwise compensate individuals, commonly
referred to as “spotters”, whose primary task is to report the presence of unauthorized
parked vehicles for the purposes of towing or removal, and impounding;
(8) May not pay any remuneration to the owner, agent, or employee of the
parking lot; and
(9) May not tow a vehicle solely for a violation of failure to display a valid
current registration under § 13–411 of this article until 72 hours after a notice of violation
is placed on the vehicle.
(b) A person may not charge for the actual cost of providing notice under
subsection (a)(1)(iv) of this section if the vehicle owner, the owner’s agent, the insurer of
record, or any secured party retakes possession of the vehicle within 48 hours after the
vehicle was received at the storage facility.
(c) The Administration shall:
(1) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ALLOW FOR ELECTRONIC NOTIFICATION
TO VEHICLE OWNERS UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3)(II) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) Establish and maintain a database containing the proper address for
providing notice to an insurer under subsection [(a)(3)] (A)(3)(III) of this section for each
insurer authorized to write a vehicle liability insurance policy in the State; and
[(2)] (3) Make the database REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION available to any tower free of charge.
(d) An agreement to provide notice electronically made in accordance with
subsection [(a)(3)(ii)] (A)(3)(III) of this section shall remain in effect until terminated by
either party.
– 3 –

Ch. 521 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
25–204.
(a) (1) As soon as reasonably possible and within 7 days at most after it takes
an abandoned vehicle into custody, a police department shall send a notice, by certified
mail, return receipt requested, bearing a postmark from the United States Postal Service,
to:
(i) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE last known registered owner of the vehicle; and
(ii) Subject to paragraph [(2)] (3) of this subsection, each secured
party, as shown on the records of the Administration.
(2) A POLICE DEPARTMENT MAY NOTIFY THE LAST KNOWN
REGISTERED OWNER ELECTRONICALLY THROUGH THE ADMINISTRATION IF:
(I) THE ADMINISTRATION SENDS THE NOTICE TO THE OWNER
USING THE E–MAIL ADDRESS THE OWNER PROVIDED TO THE ADMINISTRATION, AS
SHOWN IN THE RECORDS OF THE ADMINISTRATION; AND
(II) THE POLICE DEPARTMENT SENDS THE OWNER NOTICE BY
CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, AND FIRST–CLASS MAIL, IF THE
OWNER DOES NOT RESPOND WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER THE ELECTRONIC NOTICE WAS
SENT BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
[(2)] (3) A police department may send notice to any secured party
electronically, if that form of notice is agreed to by the police department, the tower, and
the secured party in writing or by electronic communication.
(b) The notice shall:
(1) State that the abandoned vehicle has been taken into custody;
(2) Describe the year, make, model, and vehicle identification number of
the vehicle;
(3) Give the location of the facility where the vehicle is held;
(4) (i) Inform the owner and secured party of the owner’s and secured
party’s right to reclaim the vehicle within 3 weeks after the date of the notice, on payment
of all towing, preservation, and storage charges resulting from taking or placing the vehicle
in custody; or
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 521
(ii) In Baltimore City and Montgomery County, subject to subsection
(a)(2) AND (3) of this section, be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, and inform
the owner and secured party of the owner’s and secured party’s right to reclaim the vehicle
within 11 working days after the receipt of the notice, on payment of all towing,
preservation, and storage charges resulting from taking or placing the vehicle in custody;
and
(5) State that the failure of the owner or secured party to exercise this right
in the time provided is:
(i) A waiver by the owner or secured party of all of the owner’s or
secured party’s right, title, and interest in the vehicle;
(ii) A consent to the sale of the vehicle at public auction; and
(iii) A consent by the owner other than a lessor to the retention of the
vehicle for public purposes as provided in § 25–207 of this subtitle.
(c) In Baltimore City, Prince George’s County, and Montgomery County, a police
department or its agent may seek to recover costs of impoundment, storage, and sale of a
vehicle as provided by §§ 25–206.1 and 25–206.2 of this subtitle. If a police department or
its agent seeks to apply the provisions of §§ 25–206.1 and 25–206.2 of this subtitle, the
notice required by this section shall also state that the failure of the owner or secured party
to exercise the right to reclaim the vehicle in the time provided may cause:
(1) Continuing liability of the owner for costs of:
(i) Impoundment;
(ii) Storage within the chargeable limit for storage as provided in §
25–206.1(b) of this subtitle; and
(iii) Sale of the vehicle; and
(2) Denial of any application by the owner to renew the registration of any
vehicle as required by § 25–206.2 of this subtitle.
(D) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ALLOW FOR
ELECTRONIC NOTIFICATION TO THE LAST KNOWN REGISTERED OWNER OF A
VEHICLE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
25–205.
(a) This section applies if:
– 5 –

Ch. 521 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) The identity of the last registered owner of an abandoned vehicle cannot
be determined;
(2) The registration of the vehicle gives no address for the owner;
(3) It is impossible to determine with reasonable certainty the identity and
address of each secured party;
(4) The certified mail notice required by § 25–204 of this subtitle is
returned as undeliverable; or
(5) The electronic [notice] NOTICES authorized under [§ 25–204] §
25–204(A)(2) OR (3) of this subtitle [is] ARE not acknowledged or [is] ARE returned as
undeliverable.
(b) Under one of the conditions described in subsection (a) of this section, a police
department that takes an abandoned vehicle into custody shall give the required notice by
posting a notice complying with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section in the circuit
court of the county where the abandoned vehicle was found.
(c) The notice:
(1) May contain multiple listings of abandoned vehicles;
(2) Shall contain the information required by § 25–204 of this subtitle; and
(3) Shall be posted:
(i) Within 15 days of the taking into custody of the vehicle; or
(ii) If the notice by posting under this section is made because of the
return as undeliverable of a prior notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, bearing
a postmark from the United States Postal Service, within 7 days of the return of that prior
notice.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 6 –